sv: Broccolisort: Babybroccoli; Calabrese; Kinesisk broccoli (Gai lan); Marathon; Minibroccoli; Purple sprouting; Romanesco; Sparrisbroccoli; Tenderstem (broccolini); Övrigt
pt-PT: Variedade de brócolo: Mini brócolos; Calabrês; Brócolos chineses (gai lan); Marathon; Mini brócolos; Brócolo de rebento roxo; Romanesco; Brócolos de rebento; Tenderstem (broccolini); Outro
pl: Odmiana brokułu: Brokuł baby; Calabrese; Brokuł chiński (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brokuł; Brokuł gałązkowy fioletowy; Romanesco; Brokuł gałązkowy; Bimi (Broccolini); Inne
it: Varietà di broccoli: Baby broccoli; Calabrese; Broccoli cinesi (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini broccoli; Violetto; Broccolo romanesco; Broccolo da germogli; Tenderstem (broccolini); Altro
ko: 브로콜리 품종: 베이비 브로콜리; 칼라브레세; 차이니즈 브로콜리(가이란); 마라톤; 미니 브로콜리; 퍼플 스프라우팅; 로마네스코; 스프라우팅 브로콜리; 텐더스팀(브로콜리니); 기타
hu: Brokkolifajta: Bébibrokkoli; Calabrese; Kínai brokkoli (Gai lan); Maraton; Minibrokkoli; Lila brokkoli; Romanesco; Hajtásbrokkoli; Broccolini; Egyéb
zh-TW: 綠花椰品種: 迷你花椰菜; 卡拉布雷斯 (Calabrese); 芥藍菜 (Gai lan); 馬拉松 (Marathon); 迷你花椰菜; 紫花芥藍; 羅馬花椰菜; 發芽花椰菜; 青花筍 (Broccolini); 其他
da: Broccolivariant: Babybroccoli; Calabrese; Kinesisk broccoli (gai lan); Marathon; Minibroccoli; Lilla aspargesbroccoli; Romanesco; Aspargesbroccoli; Tenderstem (broccolini); Andet
hr-HR: Sorta brokule: Mlada brokula; Kalabreze; Kineska brokula (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brokula; Ljubičasta mladica; Romanesco; Brokula s mladicama; Tenderstem (brokulini); Ostalo
nb: Brokkolivariant: Babybrokkoli; Calabrese; Kinesisk brokkoli (gai lan); Marathon; Minibrokkoli; Lilla spirebrokkoli; Romanesco; Spirebrokkoli; Tenderstem (brokkolini); Annet
fi: Parsakaalilajike: Varsiparsakaali; Calabrese; Kiinalainen parsakaali (gai lan); Marathon; Miniparsakaali; Purppuraparsakaali; Romanesco; Versova parsakaali; Varsiparsakaali (broccolini); Muu
ja: ブロッコリーの種類: ベビーブロッコリー; カラブレーゼ; チャイニーズブロッコリー (ガイラン); マラソン; ミニブロッコリー; パープルスプラウティング; ロマネスコ; スプラウティングブロッコリー; テンダーステム (ブロッコリーニ); その他
vi: Giống bông cải xanh: Súp lơ xanh baby; Súp lơ Calabrese; Cải rổ (Gai lan); Marathon; Súp lơ xanh mini; Mầm súp lơ tím; Súp lơ Romanesco; Súp lơ mầm non; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Khác
th: พันธุ์บรอกโคลี: เบบี้บรอกโคลี; คาราเบรส; คะน้าฮ่องกง; มาราธอน; มินิบรอกโคลี; เพอร์เพิลสเปราต์ติง; โรมาเนสโก; สเปราต์ติงบรอกโคลี; เทนเดอร์สเต็ม (บรอกโคลินี); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Variedade de brócolis: Brócolis baby; Calabrês; Brócolis chinês (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brócolis; Brotos roxos; Romanesco; Brócolis de brotos; Brócolis de talo macio (Broccolini); Outros
tr: Brokoli çeşidi: Bebek brokoli; Calabrese; Çin brokolisi (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brokoli; Mor filizlenen; Romanesco; Filizlenen brokoli; İnce saplı (Broccolini); Diğer
nl: Broccoli ras: Babybroccoli; Calabrese; Chinese broccoli (Kailan); Marathon; Minibroccoli; Purple sprouting; Romanesco; Scheutbroccoli; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Overig
zh-CN: 西兰花品种: 迷你西蓝花; 卡拉布里亚西蓝花; 芥蓝; 马拉松西蓝花; 迷你西蓝花; 紫发芽西蓝花; 罗马花椰菜; 发芽西蓝花; 芦笋西蓝花 (Broccolini); 其他
sk-SK: Odroda brokolice: Baby brokolica; Calabrese; Čínska brokolica (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brokolica; Fialová výhonková; Romanesco; Výhonková brokolica; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Iné
ro-RO: Varietate de broccoli: Baby broccoli; Calabrez; Broccoli chinezesc (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini broccoli; Broccoli cu lăstari violet; Romanesco; Lăstari de broccoli; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Altele
bg-BG: Сорт броколи: Бейби броколи; Калабрезе; Китайски броколи (гай лан); Маратон; Мини броколи; Лилави броколи; Романеско; Броколи за кълнове; Тендерстем (броколини); Друго
lt-LT: Brokolių rūšis: Mažieji brokoliai; Kalabrijos brokoliai; Kinijos brokoliai (Gai lan); Marathon rūšis; Mini brokoliai; Violetiniai smidriniai brokoliai; Romanesco brokoliai; Smidriniai brokoliai; Tenderstem (Brokolini); Kitas
cs: Odrůda brokolice: Baby brokolice; Kalábrijská brokolice; Čínská brokolice (Kaj-lan); Marathon; Mini brokolice; Fialová výhonková brokolice; Romanesco; Výhonková brokolice; Broccolini (Tenderstem); Jiné
en: Broccoli variety: Baby broccoli; Calabrese; Chinese broccoli (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini broccoli; Purple sprouting; Romanesco; Sprouting broccoli; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Other
ru: Сорт брокколи: Бэби брокколи; Калабрезе; Китайская брокколи (Гай лан); Марафон; Мини-брокколи; Фиолетовая спаржевая; Романеско; Спаржевая брокколи; Тендерстем (Брокколини); Другое
sl-SI: Sorta brokolija: Mladi brokoli; Kalabrijski; Kitajski brokoli (Gai lan); Marathon; Mini brokoli; Vijolični brstični; Romanesco; Brstični brokoli; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Drugo
fr: Variété de brocoli: Bébé brocoli; Calabrais; Brocoli chinois (gai lan); Marathon; Mini brocoli; Brocoli à jets violets; Romanesco; Brocoli à jets; Broccolini (Tenderstem); Autre
el: Ποικιλία μπρόκολου: Μπρόκολο baby; Καλαβρίας; Κινεζικό μπρόκολο (Gai lan); Μαραθώνιος (Marathon); Μίνι μπρόκολο; Μοβ (purple sprouting); Ρομανέσκο; Μπρόκολο βλαστών (Sprouting); Tenderstem (Μπροκολίνι); Άλλο
de: Brokkolisorte: Baby-Brokkoli; Calabrese; Chinesischer Brokkoli (Gai Lan); Marathon; Mini-Brokkoli; Purple Sprouting; Romanesco; Spargelkohl; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Sonstiges
es: Variedad de brócoli: Brócoli baby; Calabrese; Brócoli chino (Gai lan); Marathon; Minibrócoli; Brócoli morado; Romanesco; Brócoli de brotes; Tenderstem (Broccolini); Otro